Montana, session 2025, HB178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 4], unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Artificial intelligence system" means a machine learning-based system that, for any explicit or
implicit objective, infers from the inputs the system receives how to generate outputs, including but not limited
to content, decisions, predictions, and recommendations that can influence physical or virtual environments.
(2) "Cognitive behavioral manipulation" means the use of artificial intelligence systems to influence
or alter an individual's or group's thoughts, emotions, decisions, or actions through deceptive, coercive, or
subliminal means, or by exploiting psychological vulnerabilities, without the informed consent of the individual or
group being influenced.
(3) "Government entity" has the same meaning as provided in 46-5-110.
(4) "Human in an appropriate responsible position" means a human person who is a state officer or
a public employee as those terms are defined in 2-2-102 who has reasonable training in the uses and
limitations of artificial intelligence systems and is in a position to modify or reject the particular use of an artificial
intelligence system.
(5) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as provided in 45-2-101.
(6) "State officer" has the same meaning as provided in 2-2-102.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 178
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 178
Section 2. Prohibited use of artificial intelligence by government entity. A government entity or
state officer may not use an artificial intelligence system:
(1) for the cognitive behavioral manipulation of a person or group;
(2) to classify a person or group based on behavior, socioeconomic status, or personal
characteristics resulting in unlawful discrimination or a disparate impact on a person or group based on an
actual or perceived differentiating characteristic;
(3) for a malicious purpose; or
(4) for surveillance of public spaces, except:
(a) to locate a missing, endangered, or wanted person; or
(b) in conformity with Title 44, chapter 15, part 1, regarding continuous facial surveillance.
Section 3. Required disclosures by government entities -- exemption. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2):
(a) if a government entity or state officer publishes material produced by an artificial intelligence
system that is not reviewed by a human in an appropriate responsible position, the material must be
accompanied by a disclosure that the material was produced by an artificial intelligence system; and
(b) if a government entity or state officer has an interface with the public that uses an artificial
intelligence system, the use of the artificial intelligence system in the interface must be disclosed.
(2) A peace officer acting in the peace officer's official capacity to investigate crimes is exempt
from a disclosure requirement in subsection (1) when the disclosure may result in:
(a) endangerment of the life or physical safety of an individual;
(b) flight from prosecution;
(c) destruction or tampering with evidence;
(d) intimidation of potential witnesses; or
(e) otherwise seriously jeopardizing an investigation or unduly delaying a trial.
Section 4. Required review. If an artificial intelligence system produces a recommendation or
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 178
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 178
decision for a government entity or state officer that could impact the rights, duties, or privileges and immunities
of a person, the recommendation or decision must be reviewed and is subject to rejection or modification by a
human in an appropriate responsible position.
Section 5. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 4] are intended to be codified as an integral
part of Title 2, and the provisions of Title 2 apply to [sections 1 through 4].
Section 6. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are severable from the
invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications, the part remains in
effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 178
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 178, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 178
INTRODUCED BY B. MITCHELL, D. ZOLNIKOV, C. HINKLE, G. LAMMERS, J. GILLETTE, T. FALK, K.
BOGNER
AN ACT LIMITING THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEMS BY STATE AND LOCAL
GOVERNMENT; PROHIBITING CERTAIN USES OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEMS; REQUIRING
DISCLOSURE OF CERTAIN USES OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEMS; REQUIRING CERTAIN
DECISIONS OR RECOMMENDATIONS TO BE REVIEWED BY A HUMAN IN AN APPROPRIATE
RESPONSIBLE POSITION; AND PROVIDING DEFINITIONS.